Hawaii statutes.
[§654-1] Information required. (a) An
action may be brought to secure the immediate possession of personal property
in any court of competent jurisdiction by filing a verified complaint showing:

(1) That the plaintiff is entitled to the immediate
possession of the property claimed;

(2) A particular description of the property claimed;
if the property claimed is a portion of divisible property of uniform kind,
quality, or value, that such is the case, and the amount thereof which the
plaintiff claims;

(3) The actual value of the property claimed;

(4) That the property has not been taken for a tax,
assessment, or fine pursuant to a statute, or seized under an execution or an
attachment against the plaintiff or the plaintiff's property, or if so seized that
it is by statute exempt from such seizure;

(5) That the property is in the possession of a named
defendant, and the facts and circumstances relating to the possession thereof
by the defendant, according to the plaintiff's best knowledge and belief; and

(6) The names of all persons other than the defendant
in possession of the property, having or claiming or who might have or claim to
have an interest in the property according to the best belief of plaintiff, all
of whom shall be joined as defendants in the action.

(b) If the action already has been commenced,
an affidavit may be filed at any time before the case is at issue, containing
the information required by subsection (a). [L Sp 1949, c 7, pt of §1; RL 1955,
§244-20; HRS §654-21; am L 1972, c 90, §1(a); ren HRS §654-1; gen ch 1985]

Revision Note

In subsection (a)(5), "and" added after ending
punctuation pursuant to §23G-15.

Rules of Court

Verification, whether required, see HRCP rule 11.

Case Notes

Validity of prejudgment replevin provisions authorizing
taking of property without affording prior opportunity to be heard. 407 U.S.
67 (1972).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next